Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “property” means:
(a) Buildings, structures, land and curtilage.
(b) Vehicles located on private property or in a location where the owner of the vehicle
has a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(c) A church, synagogue, temple, mosque, chapel, meeting house or  other nonresidential
place of worship.
(d) A school or other educational facility.
(e) A facility that provides medical treatment.
(f) Any place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy.
(2) An owner or occupant  of property, or a person lawfully present on property with a
reasonable expectation of privacy, may bring a cause  of action against an individual who
under color of law enters the property  without a warrant for which the issuing authority is
a court, if a judicially recognized exception to the warrant requirement does not apply.
(3) A plaintiff who prevails  in a cause of action under this section may recover actual
economic and noneconomic damages, equitable relief and any other appropriate relief.
(4)(a) In an action brought under this section,  the court shall award reasonable attorney
fees and costs to a prevailing  plaintiff. In an action for injunctive relief under this section,
the court shall deem a plaintiff to  have prevailed if the plaintiff’s suit was a substantial
factor or significant catalyst in obtaining the results sought by the litigation.
(b) The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and costs to a defendant in an action
under this section for defending any claims the court finds frivolous.
(5) A person may not bring an action under this section against a person subject  to suit
for the injury under  42 U.S.C.  1983, including but not limited to a law enforcement agency
or an officer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.822.
(6) An action under this section must  be commenced within two years after the cause
of action accrues.
Enrolled House Bill 4114 (HB 4114-A) Page 1
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 18, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4114 (HB 4114-A) Page 2